District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

31-5726

Separation of fraternal and insurance activities — Continuation and supervision of original corporation.

Repealed.

Apr. 12, 1930, 46 Stat. 160, ch. 135, § 5
May 21, 1997, D.C. Law 11-268, § 10(o), 44 DCR 1730
Apr. 29, 1998, D.C. Law 12-86,§ 1237(c), 45 DCR 1172
1981 Ed., § 35-1226.
1973 Ed., § 35-926.
Department of Insurance abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 31-5702.